Maryland, session 2025, HB0891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–758.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “LOCAL NEWSROOM” MEANS A NEWS ORGANIZATION THAT:
1. PRIMARILY COVERS LOCAL COMMUNITIES IN THE
STATE;
2. EMPLOYS AT LEAST ONE FULL–TIME LOCAL
NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0891*

HOUSE BILL 891
3. HAS BEEN PUBLISHING OR BROADCASTING NEWS FOR
AT LEAST 1 YEAR; AND
4. CARRIES A MEDIA LIABILITY INSURANCE POLICY AT
ALL TIMES DURING A TAXABLE YEAR.
(II) “LOCAL NEWSROOM” DOES NOT INCLUDE A NEWS
ORGANIZATION THAT IS OWNED OR FUNDED BY A POLITICAL ADVOCACY GROUP,
INCLUDING AN ORGANIZATION AUTHORIZED TO ENGAGE IN POLITICAL ACTIVITY
UNDER § 501(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(3) “LOCAL NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN EMPLOYEE ENGAGED
OR ASSISTING IN THE GATHERING, PREPARING, COLLECTING, WRITING,
RECORDING, DIRECTING THE RECORDING, PRODUCING, EDITING,
PHOTOGRAPHING, REPORTING, PRESENTING, OR PUBLISHING OF LOCAL
COMMUNITY NEWS IN THE STATE FOR DISSEMINATION TO THE LOCAL COMMUNITY.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR EACH
TAXABLE YEAR A LOCAL NEWSROOM MAY CLAIM A CREDIT AGAINST THE STATE
INCOME TAX FOR EACH FULL–TIME LOCAL NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE EMPLOYED BY
THE LOCAL NEWSROOM IN AN AMOUNT UP TO:
(I) $25,000 OF THE WAGES PAID TO EACH FULL–TIME LOCAL
NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE FOR THE FIRST TAXABLE YEAR THAT THE LOCAL NEWSROOM
CLAIMS THE CREDIT FOR THAT LOCAL NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE; AND
(II) $15,000 OF THE WAGES PAID TO EACH FULL–TIME LOCAL
NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT TAXABLE YEAR THAT THE LOCAL
NEWSROOM CLAIMS THE CREDIT FOR THAT LOCAL NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE.
(2) A LOCAL NEWSROOM MAY NOT CLAIM A TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION FOR MORE THAN 5 TAXABLE YEARS FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL LOCAL
NEWSROOM EMPLOYEE.
(C) IF THE TAX CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION IN ANY TAXABLE
YEAR EXCEEDS THE TOTAL TAX OTHERWISE PAYABLE BY THE LOCAL NEWSROOM
FOR THAT TAXABLE YEAR, THE LOCAL NEWSROOM MAY CLAIM A REFUND IN THE
AMOUNT OF THE EXCESS.
(D) A LOCAL NEWSROOM THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE MAY APPLY THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION

HOUSE BILL 891 3
AS A CREDIT FOR THE PAYMENT TO THE COMPTROLLER OF TAXES THAT THE LOCAL
NEWSROOM:
(1) IS REQUIRED TO WITHHOLD FROM THE WAGES OF EMPLOYEES
UNDER § 10–908 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(2) IS REQUIRED TO PAY TO THE COMPTROLLER UNDER § 10–906(A)
OF THIS TITLE.
(E) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.